West Virginia, session 2026, HB5491.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 11D. THE MOTION PICTURE FAIR COMPETITION ACT. §47-11D-5. Open Captioning for Motion Pictures. (a) Exhibitors of digital motion pictures who operate theatres in more than one location in this state shall provide open captioning during at least two showings per week of each motion picture that is produced and offered with open captioning.(b) Upon request, audio description shall be provided for any digital motion picture that is produced and offered with audio description. Each theatre shall have at least two audio description devices.(c) Notwithstanding any section of this code to the contrary, no exhibitor may be required to purchase new equipment in order to comply with the requirements set forth in this section where doing so would result in an undue burden to the exhibitor or a fundamental alteration of the theatre.  (d) The requirements set forth in this section do not apply to the following:(1) A drive-in movie theatre;(2) A theatre with fewer than six screens;(3) A theatre that is not equipped with a digital projection system or a theatre with a digital projection system that does not support open caption files;(4) A motion picture that is shown in a theatre fewer than eight times from Friday through Thursday in a seven-day period; or(5) Any motion picture shown by a theatre after 20 days have passed since the day the movie premiered at that theatre.